Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 5. Other Officials and Employees.

Sec. 29.20.360.
Appointment of officials.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the municipal clerk, attorney, treasurer, and police chief are appointed by the chief administrator. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, an official described in this section serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority and, if appointed by the chief administrator, must be confirmed by the governing body.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 205 — 288.

Sec. 29.20.370.
Municipal attorney.

The municipal attorney is the legal advisor of the governing body, the school board, and the other officials of the municipality.
The municipal attorney represents the municipality as attorney in civil and criminal proceedings. The school board may hire independent counsel when in its judgment independent counsel is needed.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 371.

Authority of attorney to compromise action — modern cases. 90 ALR4th 326.

Attorney’s compensation for services in matters involving municipalities. 143 ALR 829, 56 ALR2d 13; 57 ALR3d 475; 57 ALR3d 550; 57 ALR3d 584; 58 ALR3d 201; 58 ALR3d 235; 58 ALR3d 317; 59 ALR3d 152; 10 ALR5th 448; Russell v. Criterion Ins. Co., 917 P.2d 664 (Alaska 1996); 53 ALR4th 161; 86 ALR Fed. 866.

Sec. 29.20.380.
Municipal clerk.

The municipal clerk shall

attend meetings of the governing body and its boards and committees as required and keep the journal;

have custody of the official municipal seal;

assure that notice and other requirements for public meetings are complied with and assure that public records are available for public inspection as required by law;

manage municipal records and develop retention schedules and procedures for inventory, storage, and destruction of records as necessary;

maintain an indexed file of all permanent municipal records, provide for codification of ordinances, and authenticate or certify records as necessary;

prepare agendas and agenda packets as required by the governing body;

administer all municipal elections;

assure that the municipality complies with 42 U.S.C. 1971-1974 (Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended);

take oaths, affirmations, and acknowledgements as necessary;

act as the parliamentary advisor to the governing body;

perform other duties required by law, the governing body, or the chief administrator.

The governing body may combine the office of clerk with that of treasurer. If the offices are combined, the clerk-treasurer shall, as required of the treasurer, give bond to the municipality for the faithful performance of the duties as clerk-treasurer.

The municipal clerk may act as an absentee voting official under AS

15.20.045(c)

for the limited purpose of distributing absentee ballots to qualified voters or qualified voters’ representatives under AS

15.20.072

in a municipality in which the division of elections will not be operating an absentee voting station.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1992; am § 43 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added (c).

Sec. 29.20.390.
Municipal treasurer.

Except as provided in AS

14.14.060

, the treasurer is the custodian of all municipal funds. The treasurer shall keep an itemized account of money received and disbursed. The treasurer shall pay money on vouchers drawn against appropriations.

The treasurer shall give bond to the municipality in a sum that the governing body directs.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1623.

Sec. 29.20.400.
Departments.

The governing body may establish municipal departments and distribute functions among them.

Each municipal department is administered by a department head. With the consent of the governing body, the mayor may serve as head of one or more departments or a single administrator may serve as head of two or more departments.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.410.
Personnel system.

Except as provided by (b) of this section, appointments and promotions of municipal employees are made on the basis of merit. The governing body may provide for a personnel system and classified service.

By ordinance the governing body may designate confidential or managerial positions that are wholly or partially exempt from the classified service. A wholly or partially exempt position is filled by a person who serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority and whose term of employment is determined by the appointing authority.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)